Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.080

Conservator of principal's estate or guardian of principal's person.

(1) In a power of attorney, a principal may nominate a conservator of the estate or guardian of the person for consideration by the court if protective proceedings for the principal's estate or person are begun after the principal executes the power of attorney. Except for good cause shown or disqualification, the court shall make its appointment in accordance with the principal's most recent nomination.

(2) If, after a principal executes a power of attorney, a court appoints a conservator of the estate or other fiduciary charged with the management of some or all of the principal's property, the agent is accountable to the fiduciary as well as to the principal. The power of attorney is not terminated and the agent's authority continues, subject to the provisions of RCW 11.130.335(1) and 11.130.435(4), unless limited, suspended, or terminated by the court.

(3) If, after a principal executes a power of attorney that includes health care decisions, a court appoints a guardian of the person, the agent is accountable to the fiduciary as well as to the principal. The power of attorney is not terminated and the agent's authority continues, subject to the provisions of RCW 11.130.335(1) and 11.130.435(4), unless limited, suspended, or terminated by the court.

[ 2020 c 312 s 320; 2019 c 437 s 316; 2016 c 209 s 108.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.